New York, session 2025-2026, S9685.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3.05 of the arts and cultural affairs law is 2 amended by adding a new subdivision 12 to read as follows: 3 12. (a) In collaboration with the commissioner of the office of gener- 4 al services, the council shall make a recommendation to the governor on 5 the naming of agency building one, agency building two, agency building 6 three and agency building four, located at the empire state plaza. The 7 council shall be guided by the following in their work: 8 (i) the buildings shall not be named for any person either living or 9 not; and 10 (ii) the buildings shall be named based on geographic features and/or 11 historical events that represent the state. 12 (b) The governor, in accordance with the council's recommendations and 13 after a robust public engagement effort, shall determine the names of 14 agency building one, agency building two, agency building three and 15 agency building four, within sixty days after the council submits their 16 recommendation. 17 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundredth day after it 18 shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05285-06-6